Utah statutes.
31A-27a-610.   Secured creditor's claims.
(1)  The value of a security held by a secured creditor shall be determined in
one of the following ways:
(a)  by converting the security into money according to the terms of the
agreement pursuant to which the security is delivered to the creditor; or
(b)  by agreement or litigation between the creditor and the liquidator.
(2) (a)  The receiver has the first priority to use collateral to reimburse a
prepetition loss or expense if:
(i)  a surety pays a loss or loss adjustment expense under its own surety
instrument before any petition for a delinquency proceeding;
(ii)  the principal posts collateral that remains available to reimburse the
loss, the loss adjustment expense, or both; and
(iii)  at the time of the petition, the collateral posted under this
Subsection (2)(a) has not been credited against the payments made.
(b)  If the principal under a surety bond or a surety undertaking pledges
collateral, including a guaranty or a letter of credit, to secure the
principal's reimbursement obligation to the insurer, the claim of an obligee
or, subject to the discretion of the receiver, completion contractor under the
surety bond or surety undertaking shall be satisfied first out of the
collateral or the collateral's proceeds.
(c)  In making a distribution to an obligee or completion contractor, the
receiver shall retain a sufficient reserve for any other potential claim
against the collateral under Subsection (2)(b).
(d)  If the collateral is insufficient to satisfy in full all potential claims
against it under Subsections (2)(b) and (f):
(i)  the claims shall be paid on a pro rata basis; and
(ii)  the obligees or completion contractor shall have claims, subject to
allowance pursuant to Section 31A-27a-603, for any deficiency.
(e)  If the time to assert a claim against a surety bond or a surety
undertaking expires and all claims have been satisfied in full, any remaining
collateral for the surety bond or surety undertaking shall be returned to the
principal.
(f) (i)  To the extent that a guaranty association has made a payment relating
to a claim against a surety bond, the guaranty association shall first be
reimbursed for the payment and related expenses out of the available
collateral or proceeds related to the surety bond.
(ii)  To the extent the collateral is sufficient, the guaranty association
will be reimbursed for 100% of the guaranty association's payment.
(iii)  If the collateral is insufficient to satisfy in full all potential
claims against it under this Subsection (2)(f) and Subsection (2)(b), the one
or more guaranty associations that pay claims on a surety bond:
(A)  are entitled to a pro rata share of the available collateral in
accordance with Subsection (2)(d); and
(B)  have claims against the general assets of the estate in accordance with
Section 31A-27a-603 for any deficiency.
(iv)  A payment made to a guaranty association from the collateral may not be
considered early access or otherwise considered a distribution out of the
general assets or property of the estate.
(v)  A guaranty association shall subtract any payment from the collateral
from the guaranty association's final claims against the estate.
(3) (a)  The amount determined pursuant to Subsection (1) shall be credited
upon the secured claim, and the claimant may file a proof of claim, subject to
the other provisions of this chapter, for any deficiency, which shall be
treated as an unsecured claim.
(b)  If the claimant surrenders the claimant's security to the liquidator, the
entire claim shall be treated as if unsecured.
(4)  The liquidator may recover from property securing an allowed secured
claim the reasonable, necessary costs and expenses of preserving, or disposing
of, the property to the extent of any benefit to the holder of the allowed
secured claim.
